Washington statutes.
RCW 19.315.020

Time for redemption—Transmittal of rebate—Application.

(1) Any person who offers a consumer rebate shall allow a minimum of fourteen days from the date the consumer purchases the product, or becomes eligible for the rebate upon satisfying the terms and conditions of the offer, for the submission of a request for redemption by the customer.

(2) Upon receipt of a request for redemption meeting the terms and conditions of the rebate offer, the person offering the rebate shall transmit the rebate funds to the consumer within ninety days.

(3) If a rebate is sent to a consumer as a check, the check must be mailed in a manner that identifies the piece of mail as the expected rebate check.

(4) This section applies only to the person offering the rebate, which is the person who provides the cash, credit, or credit towards future purchases to the consumer. This section does not apply to a person who processes a rebate or who provides consumers with instructions or materials related to a rebate.

[ 2009 c 374 s 2.]